Hawaii statutes.
[§551E‑11] Exoneration of agent.
A provision in a power of attorney relieving an agent of liability for breach
of duty shall be binding on the principal and the principal's successors in
interest except to the extent the provision:

(1) Relieves the agent of liability for breach of
duty committed dishonestly, with an improper motive, or with reckless
indifference to the purposes of the power of attorney or the best interest of
the principal; or

(2) Was inserted as a result of an abuse of a
confidential or fiduciary relationship with the principal. [L 2014, c 22, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next